Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7350 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. "Fully inclusive" means anyone that may require the use of a
mobility device to access or use the playground equipment; and
2. "Travel surfaces" means the material in contact with the
ground that is used by individuals to navigate the playground.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7351 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Every city, town, municipality, and public school district in
counties in Oklahoma with a population of at least one hundred
Req. No. 11234 Page 1

thou sand (100,000) persons according to the Federal Decennial Census
or most recent population estimate, that plan to:
1. Install new playground equipment and travel surfaces; or
2. Update existing playground equipment and travel surfaces,
shall ensure that all material and equipment are fully inclusive and
accessible for adults and children of all ages.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11234 TJ 01/13/25















Req. No. 11234 Page 2